Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


Req. No. 16432 Page 1

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 106.4, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 100, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 106.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 106.4. A. 1. The court reporter shall make a full
reporting by means of stenographic hand, steno-mask stenomask or,
stenographic machine notes, or any other method of reporting
authorized by the Supreme Court, or a combination thereof, of all
proceedings, including the statements of counsel and the court and
the evidence, in trials and other judicial proceedings to which the
court reporter is assigned by the appointing judge unless excused by
the judge who is trying the case with the consent of the parties to
the action. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to
authorize the certification of persons as certified shorthand
reporters who rely exclusively upon the steno-mask for reporting
judicial proceedings, except as provided by law. A refusal of the
court to permit or to require any statement to be taken down by the
court reporter or transcribed after being taken down, upon the same
being shown by affidavit or other direct and competent evidence, to
the Supreme Court, or other appellate court, shall constitute a
denial of due process of law. The court reporter may use an
electronic instrument as a supplementary device.
2. In any trial, hearing, or proceedings, if no court reporter
is available to the assigned judge either in person or remotely:

Req. No. 16432 Page 2

a. the judge before whom the matter is being heard may
order the proceedings electronically recorded and a
trial, hearing, or proceedings may proceed without the
necessity of a court reporter being present. Provided
that if an official transcript is ordered then it
shall be prepared by the official court reporter Any
party may order a transcript from the proceedings
electronically recorded; provided that, only
transcripts prepared by an official court reporter may
be used in any subsequent trial, hearing, proceeding,
or appeal, or
b. with approval of the judge, the parties may stipulate
to the use of a freelance reporter and share the cost.
If ordered, the transcript shall be prepared by the
approved reporter and shall be considered the official
transcript for all purposes.
B. 1. Upon request of either party in a civil or criminal
case, the reporter shall transcribe the proceedings in a trial or
other judicial proceeding, or so much thereof as may be requested by
the party, certify to the correctness of the transcript, and deliver
the same in accordance with the rules of the Supreme Court. The fee
for an original transcript shall be set by the Supreme Court. Two
copies of the original transcript shall be furnished without
additional charge. Each page shall be at least twenty-five lines to
Req. No. 16432 Page 3

the page and typed no fewer than nine characters to the typed inch.
Each page shall be no more than double spaced and the margin on the
left side of the page shall be no more than one and one-half (1 1/2)
inches and the margin on the right side of the page shall be no more
than one-half (1/2) inch from the edge of the paper. The format for
all transcripts shall be prescribed by the Supreme Court. The fees
for making the transcript shall be paid in the first instance by the
party requesting the transcript and shall be taxed as costs in the
suit.
2. When the judge on his or her own motion orders a transcript
of the reporter's notes, the judge may direct the payment of charges
and the taxation of the charges as costs in such manner as the court
deems appropriate. In a criminal action, if the defendant shall
present to the judge an affidavit that the defendant intends in good
faith to take an appeal in the case and that a transcript of the
reporter's notes is necessary to enable the defendant to prosecute
the appeal, and that he or she has not the means to pay for the
transcript, the court, upon finding that there is reasonable basis
for the averment, shall order the transcript made at the expense of
the district court fund. The format preparation, delivery and
filing of transcripts to be used in civil and criminal appeals may
be regulated by the Supreme Court.


Req. No. 16432 Page 4

C. The court reporter shall file his or her records of the
evidence and the proceedings taken in any case with the clerk of the
court in which the case was tried.
D. To the extent that it does not substantially interfere with
the court reporter's other official duties, the judge by whom a
reporter is employed or to whom he or she is assigned may assign a
reporter to secretarial or clerical duties arising out of official
court operations.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 106.9, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 263, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 106.9), is amended to read as follows:
Section 106.9. A. Each court reporter regularly engaged by the
district court, the Workers' Compensation Court of Existing Claims,
or the Corporation Commission shall be paid a salary pursuant to the
salary schedule established by the annual appropriation for the
district courts and Corporation Commission and in accordance with
the job description for the position to which appointed. For fiscal
year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter, each court reporter shall
receive an annual salary of Fifty-three Thousand Dollars
($53,000.00).
B. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
who are certified or licensed shorthand reporters and those acting
shorthand reporters pursuant to paragraph 3 of Section 106.3B of
this title shall be paid annually the sum of Four Hundred Dollars
Req. No. 16432 Page 5

($40 0.00) for each year of service to the district court, the
Workers' Compensation Court, the Workers' Compensation Court of
Existing Claims and the Corporation Commission, with a maximum of
twenty (20) years of service only to be used for the purpose of
longevity, not to exceed Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00) per
year, payable monthly. For the purpose of payment for longevity,
"years of service" is defined as all years served as a certified or
licensed court reporter in the district court, the Workers'
Compensation Court, the Workers' Compensation Court of Existing
Claims and the Corporation Commission after June 30, 1978.
Longevity payments shall be made on July 1 of each year following
completion of the first year of service as defined herein.
C. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
eligible for longevity payments pursuant to subsection B of this
section shall be paid an annual equipment allowance of Three
Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00). Payments for such allowance shall be
made on July 1 of each year following completion of the first year
of service as defined in subsection B of this section.
D. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
who are certified shorthand reporters shall be paid the following:
1. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a holds one
or more of the following certifications:

Req. No. 16432 Page 6

a. Registered Professional Reporter (RPR), as recognized
by the State Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand
Reporters. To qualify as a RPR, an official court
reporter shall have a National Court Reporters
Association,
b. Certified Verbatim Reporter, as recognized by the
National Verbatim Reporters Association,
c. Certified Verbatim Reporter – Stenotype (CVR-S), as
recognized by the National Verbatim Reporters
Association, or
d. other certifications authorized by the Supreme Court
that demonstrate a proficiency level in reporting
testimony and proceedings of a speed of not less than
two hundred twenty-five (225) words per minute in
taking a question-and-answer-type dictation, two
hundred (200) words per minute in taking a jury
charge, and one hundred eighty (180) words per minute
in taking literary material,. In addition, the
individual shall pass a the Oklahoma Written Knowledge
Test with a score of at least seventy percent (70%),
all as determined by an examination recognized by the
Board, and shall complete thirty (30) hours of
continuing education per three-year cycle commencing

Req. No. 16432 Page 7

at the date of recognition as directed by the Supreme
Court;
2. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a holds one
or more of the following certifications:
a. Registered Merit Reporter (RMR), as recognized by the
State Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand
Reporters. To qualify as a RMR, an official court
reporter shall have National Court Reporters
Association,
b. Certificate of Merit (CM) or Certificate of Merit
Stenotype (CM-S), as recognized by the National
Verbatim Reporters Association, or
c. other certifications authorized by the Supreme Court
that demonstrate a proficiency level in reporting
testimony and proceedings of a speed of not less than
two hundred sixty (260) words per minute in taking a
question-and-answer-type dictation, two hundred forty
(240) words per minute in taking a jury charge, and
two hundred (200) words per minute in taking literary
material,. In addition, the individual shall pass a
the Oklahoma Written Knowledge Test with a score of at
least seventy percent (70%), all as determined by an
examination recognized by the Board, and shall
Req. No. 16432 Page 8

complete thirty (30) hours of continuing education per
three-year cycle commencing at the date of recognition
as directed by the Supreme Court;
3. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is holds a
certification as a Registered Diplomat Reporter (RDR), as recognized
by the State Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters,
and who completes thirty (30) hours of continuing education per
three-year cycle commencing at the date of recognition National
Court Reporters Association;
4. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a holds one
or more of the following certifications:
a. Certified Realtime Reporter (CRR), as recognized by
the State Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand
Reporters, and who completes thirty (30) hours of
continuing education per three-year cycle commencing
at the date of recognition National Court Reporters
Association, or
b. Realtime Verbatim Reporter - Master (RVR-M) or
Realtime Verbatim Reporter - Master - Stenotype (RVR-
M-S), as recognized by the National Verbatim Reporters
Association; or

Req. No. 16432 Page 9

5. Any official court reporter who is the holder of more than
one certification shall be compensated in the additional amounts
specified in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this subsection for each
certification up to a maximum of Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00)
per year over and above the reporter's base salary, payable monthly.
E. In the event of a lapse in a court reporter's certification,
compensation for that certification as provided for in subsection D
of this section which is over and above the court reporter's salary
shall be suspended until the certification is renewed or reinstated.
Compensation shall not be paid to a court reporter for any period
during which the court reporter's certification was not in good
standing.
F. Court reporters temporarily employed by the district court,
Workers' Compensation Court of Existing Claims, or Corporation
Commission shall be compensated by the court fund of the court which
they serve at a rate to be set by such court. In addition, court
reporters temporarily employed pursuant to this subsection who are
required by the terms of their employment to travel outside their
county of residence shall receive reimbursement for mileage actually
and necessarily traveled to and from the place of attendance at a
rate not to exceed the rate of reimbursement specified in the State
Travel Reimbursement Act for state employees. Any travel
reimbursement shall be paid from the court fund of the court where
the service of the temporarily employed court reporter is provided.
Req. No. 16432 Page 10

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1503, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1503. A. Every applicant who seeks to be examined for
enrollment as a certified shorthand reporter shall prove to the
satisfaction of the State Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand
Reporters that he or she:
1. Is of legal age;
2. Meets the requisite standards of ethical fitness; and
3. Has at least a high school education or its equivalent.
B. The examination for certification in one or more authorized
methods of shorthand reporting consists of two parts, designated
Part 1 and Part 2 as follows:
1. Part 1 consists of the test as authorized by the Supreme
Court consisting of the following requirements: demonstrated
proficiency in reporting testimony and proceedings at a speed of not
more than two hundred (200) words per minute in taking a question-
and-answer-type dictation and at a speed of not more than one
hundred eighty (180) words per minute in taking literary materials
which shall be designed to test the ability of an applicant to
accurately prepare a transcript of testimony and proceedings that is
reasonably free from spelling errors. The Board may not increase or
decrease such minimum speed requirement, by rule or otherwise; and
2. Part 2 is the Oklahoma Written Knowledge test Test which
consists of not less than twenty-five multiple choice questions
Req. No. 16432 Page 11

rela ting to Oklahoma law and court rules, duties of certified
shorthand reporters, and general court procedure.
The examination shall be approved by the Supreme Court. A
person who has tested with the Board and successfully completed the
written knowledge portion of the examination shall be allowed to
retain the credit for that portion for two (2) years from the date
passed, and shall not be required to retake that portion during the
two-year period.
C. An applicant who is academically dishonest when taking any
authorized examination is disqualified and may not take the
examination again until two (2) years have elapsed from the date of
the examination at which the applicant was disqualified.
D. A certification issued under this section must be for one or
more of the following methods of shorthand reporting:
1. Written shorthand;
2. Machine shorthand;
2. Stenomask shorthand; or
3. Any other method of shorthand reporting authorized by the
Supreme Court.
E. No person may engage in shorthand reporting in this state
unless the person is a licensed or certified shorthand reporter or
otherwise authorized by law or the Supreme Court.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 16432 Page 12

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16432 GRS 02/17/26




















Req. No. 16432 Page 13